Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 3

Registration of Stallions

44-7-301. Pedigreed jacks or bulls for breeding to be registered.

The pedigree of any jack or bull, claimed to be pedigreed livestock and used for public breeding, shall be filed and registered with the county clerk, under oath that the pedigree is genuine, and the county clerk shall record the pedigree in a well-bound book to be kept in county clerk's office for that purpose.

Acts 1891, ch. 148, § 1; Shan., § 2854; Code 1932, § 5088; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 75; C. Supp. 1950, § 5088; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 44-1301; Acts 2008, ch. 924, § 2.

Amendments. The 2008 amendment deleted “, and the county clerk shall be allowed the sum of fifty cents (50¢) as fee for filing, recording, and making three (3) certified copies of the pedigree” from the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 924, § 17. July 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Brands and trade-marks of timber, §43-28-311.

Exotic animals, title 70, ch. 4, part 4.

Annual license fee for distributors of commercial fertilizers, §43-11-104.

Registration of products, registered brands, §43-8-104.

Collateral References.

Breeding of animals, constitutionality of statute designed to regulate, in order to improve, or prevent deterioration of, stock. 116 A.L.R. 1315.

44-7-302. Pedigrees to be posted.

The owner of such pedigreed stock shall, during breeding seasons, have posted conspicuously in three (3) different places in the county in which the owner lives, or in which the animal is being used for breeding purposes, a certified copy of the pedigree recorded as provided in §44-7-301.

Acts 1891, ch. 148, § 2; Shan., § 2855; Code 1932, § 5089; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1302.

44-7-303. False pedigree posted or recorded a misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly records or posts any false or fraudulent pedigree commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1891, ch. 148, § 3; Shan., § 2856; Code 1932, § 5090; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1303; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.